Missouri, session 2026, HB2886.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 620.2450, 620.2451, 620.2454, 620.2456, and 620.2459, RSMo,
are repealed and five new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 620.2450,
620.2451, 620.2454, 620.2456, and 620.2459, to read as follows:
620.2450. 1. A grant program is hereby established under sections 620.2450 to
620.2458 to award grants to applicants who seek to expand access to and improve the
reliability of broadband internet service in unserved and underserved areas of the state. The
department of economic development shall administer and act as the fiscal agent for the grant
program and shall be responsible for receiving and reviewing grant applications and awarding
grants under sections 620.2450 to 620.2458. Funding for the grant program established under
this section shall be subject to appropriation by the general assembly.
2. As used in sections 620.2450 to 620.2458, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Project", the acquisition and installation of retail broadband internet service in
unserved and underserved areas of the state;
(2) "Underserved area", a project area without access to wireline [or fixed wireless]
broadband internet service of speeds of at least [one hundred] three hundred megabits per-
second download and [twenty] thirty megabits per-second upload;
(3) "Unserved area", a project area without access to wireline [or fixed wireless]
broadband internet service of speeds of at least [twenty-five] one hundred megabits per-
second download and [three] twenty megabits per-second upload.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2886 2
620.2451. 1. Grants awarded under sections 620.2450 to 620.2458 shall fund the
acquisition and installation of retail broadband internet service, prioritizing projects providing
speeds of at least the higher of:
(1) [One] Five hundred megabits per-second download and [one] five hundred
megabits per-second upload that is scalable to higher speeds; or
(2) The minimum acceptable speed established by the Federal Communications
Commission as authorized in 7 U.S.C. Section 950bb(e)(1) to (2). Any provider that is
incapable of meeting the speed requirement under this subdivision shall be allowed to
continue deploying broadband infrastructure at current speeds, provided that each provider
quarterly updates the office of broadband development regarding the provider's maximum
speed.
2. The department shall maintain a record of all federal grants awarded to entities for
the purposes of providing, maintaining, and expanding rural broadband in the state of
Missouri. In cases in which funds have been awarded by a federal agency but later retained,
withheld, or otherwise not distributed to the original grant recipient due to failure to meet
performance standards or other criteria, the department shall seek to have the funds awarded
to another eligible, qualified Missouri broadband provider.
3. The funds awarded by the department to an entity for the purposes of providing,
maintaining, and expanding rural broadband in the state of Missouri shall require the entity to
use the funds specifically for purposes set forth in the grant. If the entity uses the proceeds or
funds for any other purposes or fails to comply with any requirement established by the
department through the grant or funds awarded pursuant thereto, the entity shall return any
remaining proceeds expended or the value of any incentives or services received by the entity
to which a monetary value can be assigned, to be repaid to the department as required by the
terms of the grant or contract.
4. Any entity that was the second place finisher in any previous federal
broadband funds application shall have the right of first refusal to accept defaulted
funds recovered by the state at the rate previously applied for, subject to approval by
the state broadband office.
620.2454. 1. At least thirty days prior to the first day applications may be submitted
each fiscal year, the department of economic development shall publish on its website the
specific criteria and any quantitative weighting scheme or scoring system the department will
use to evaluate or rank applications and award grants under section 620.2455. Such criteria
and quantitative scoring system shall include the criteria set forth in section 620.2455.
2. Within three business days of the close of the grant application process, the
department of economic development shall publish on its website the proposed unserved and
underserved areas, and the proposed broadband internet speeds for each application

HCS HB 2886 3
submitted. Upon request, the department shall provide a copy of any application to an
interested party.
3. A broadband internet service provider that provides existing service in or adjacent
to the proposed project area may submit to the department of economic development, within
forty-five days of publication of the information under subsection 2 of this section, a written
challenge to an application. Such challenge shall contain information demonstrating that:
(1) The provider currently provides broadband internet service to retail customers
within the proposed unserved or underserved area;
(2) The provider has begun construction to provide broadband internet service to
retail customers within the proposed unserved or underserved area; or
(3) The provider commits to providing broadband internet service to retail customers
within the proposed unserved or underserved areas:
(a) Within the timeframe proposed by the applicant, if funded entirely with private
funds; or
(b) No later than the applicable timeline to provide broadband internet service
to retail customer established in 47 U.S.C. Section 1702(h)(4)(C), if funded by a
Broadband Equity Access and Deployment Program grant.
4. Within three business days of the submission of a written challenge, the department
of economic development shall notify the applicant of such challenge.
5. The department of economic development shall evaluate each challenge submitted
under this section. If the department determines that the provider currently provides, has
begun construction to provide, or commits to provide broadband internet service at speeds of
at least [twenty-five] five hundred megabits per-second download and [three] thirty
megabits per-second upload, but scalable to higher speeds, in the proposed project area, the
department shall not fund the challenged project.
6. If the department of economic development denies funding to an applicant as a
result of a broadband internet service provider challenge under this section and such
broadband internet service provider does not fulfill its commitment to provide broadband
internet service in the unserved or underserved area, the department of economic
development shall not consider another challenge from such broadband internet service
provider for the next two grant cycles, unless the department determines the failure to fulfill
the commitment was due to circumstances beyond the broadband internet service provider's
control.
620.2456. 1. The department of economic development shall not award any grant to
an otherwise eligible grant applicant where funding from the Connect America Fund has been
awarded, where high-cost support from the federal Universal Service Fund has been received
by rate of return carriers, or where any other federal funding has been awarded which did not

HCS HB 2886 4
require any matching-fund component, for any portion of the proposed project area, nor shall
any grant money be used to serve any retail end user that already has access to wireline or
fixed wireless broadband internet service of speeds of at least twenty-five megabits per-
second download and three megabits per-second upload.
2. No grant awarded under sections 620.2450 to 620.2458, when combined with any
federal, state, or local funds, shall fund more than fifty percent of the total cost of a project.
3. No single project shall be awarded grants under sections 620.2450 to 620.2458
whose cumulative total exceeds five million dollars.
4. The department of economic development shall endeavor to award grants under
sections 620.2450 to 620.2458 to qualified applicants in all regions of the state.
5. An award granted under sections 620.2450 to 620.2458 shall not:
(1) Require an open access network;
(2) Impose rates, terms, and conditions that differ from what a provider offers in other
areas of its service area;
(3) Impose any rate, service, or any other type of regulation beyond speed
requirements set forth in section 620.2451; [or]
(4) Impose an unreasonable time constraint on the time to build the service; or
(5) Provide middle mile infrastructure as defined in 47 U.S.C. Section 1741.
6. If a grant recipient fails to establish the speed requirements set forth in section
620.2451, then the grant recipient shall return all grant moneys to the department.
620.2459. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the program authorized under sections 620.2450, 620.2451,
620.2452, 620.2453, 620.2454, 620.2455, 620.2456, 620.2457, and 620.2458 shall sunset on
June 30, [2027, unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly] 2030; and
(2) [If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under sections 620.2450,
620.2451, 620.2452, 620.2453, 620.2454, 620.2455, 620.2456, 620.2457, and 620.2458 shall
sunset automatically six years after the effective date of the reauthorization of sections
620.2450, 620.2451, 620.2452, 620.2453, 620.2454, 620.2455, 620.2456, 620.2457, and
620.2458; and
(3)] Sections 620.2450, 620.2451, 620.2452, 620.2453, 620.2454, 620.2455,
620.2456, 620.2457, and 620.2458 shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized under sections
620.2450, 620.2451, 620.2452, 620.2453, 620.2454, 620.2455, 620.2456, 620.2457, and
620.2458 is sunset.
✔